Massachusetts, session 194th, S2489.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 115, Section 5 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official edition, is
hereby amended by adding after paragraph 7, the following:-
"The Secretary of Veterans’ Services shall promulgate regulations ensuring that should
any applicant or recipient be determined as under 300% of the current Federal Poverty Level
(FPL) and is otherwise qualified, the applicant or recipient shall be eligible for a Medical Only
budget."
of 1